src/subjunction-sma-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Subjunction
! ===========

LEXICON Subjunction
aajne Cs ; 
 aellies Cs ; !XXX from dict, check!
ahte Cs ;
bene Cs ;
daamts Cs ; 
!dannasinie Cs ; moved to adv
dastegh Cs ;
dellie Cs ;
dle Cs ;
dlie Cs ;
eannan Cs ;
eeremes Cs ; 
goh Cs ;
gujhth Cs ;
guktie Cs ; 
ihke Cs ;
ihkie Cs ;
jalhts Cs ;
jalts Cs ;
 jihkie Cs ; !XXX from dict, check!
 jilhts Cs ; !XXX from dict, check!
jis Cs ;
joem Cs ; 
juhkoe Cs ; 
juktie Cs ;
jus Cs ;
læjhkan Cs ;
maaje Cs ;
mearan Cs ;
mearas Cs ;
medtie Cs ; 
sagki Cs ; 
vaallah Cs ; 
åpmoeh Cs ; 


LEXICON Cs 
+CS:0 # ;
